California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
The manner in which disputed claims, appeals and petitions shall be presented, the reports required thereon from the claimant and from any employing unit and the conduct of hearings and appeals shall be in accordance with rules prescribed by the appeals board. The appeals board shall require administrative law judges to consolidate for hearing cases with respect to which the alleged facts and the points of law are the same. The
 appeals board shall permit a party or representative to participate in a hearing by telephone upon the party’s or representative’s request and showing a good cause, in accordance with regulations adopted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 23, Sec. 7.   (AB 29 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1952.

The appeals board and its representatives and administrative law judges are not bound by common law or statutory rules of evidence or by technical or formal rules of procedure but may conduct the hearings and appeals in such manner as to ascertain the substantial rights of the parties. A full and complete record shall be kept of all proceedings in connection with disputed claims. All testimony at any hearing held in this state upon a disputed claim arising under this division shall be recorded and, when feasible, by a reporter in shorthand or by machine writing. The testimony need not be transcribed unless the disputed claim is further
 appealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 35.)
-------------------------------------------

1953.

In any proceeding, hearing, investigation or in the discharge of any duties imposed under this division any member of the appeals board, an administrative law judge and any authorized employee designated by it may administer oaths, take depositions, certify to official acts and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda and other records.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

1953.5.

The presiding officer may conduct all or part of a hearing by telephone, television, or other electronic means, notwithstanding a party’s objection pursuant to Section 11440.30 of the Government Code, on a showing of good cause by the party requesting the hearing by telephone, television, or other electronic means.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 220, Sec. 34.   Effective August 4, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1954.

Obedience to subpenas issued in accordance with this chapter may be enforced by application to the superior court as set forth in Article 2, Chapter 2, Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1955.

No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing books, papers, correspondence, memoranda and other records as required by a subpena issued pursuant to this chapter on the ground that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty or forfeiture. No individual shall be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he is compelled, after having claimed his privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise. Nothing in this section exempts any individual
 from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1956.

Witnesses subpoenaed pursuant to this division shall be allowed the same fees which are prescribed in Section 68093 of the Government Code relative to proceedings in the superior court. Such fees and all expenses incurred in any proceeding, hearing, review or investigation by the director or the Appeals Board or the representative of either, except charges for services by counsel or other agent representing claimant, employer, or other interested person, shall be part of the expenses of administering this division, and no individual claiming benefits shall be charged by the Appeals Board, or its representative, fees of any kind in any procedure under this
 division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1729.)
-------------------------------------------

1957.

Any individual claiming benefits in any proceedings before the appeals board or its authorized representative may be represented by counsel or agent but no such counsel or agent shall charge or receive for such services more than an amount approved by the appeals board. Any person who violates any provision of this section shall for each such violation be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be imprisoned not more than six months or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 378.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

1957.5.

The department shall make available without charge printed forms for the use of any individual claiming benefits to authorize a counsel or an agent to represent him in any proceedings before the appeals board or its administrative law judges or authorized representatives. If any claimant files an authorization for such representation with the appeals board or its administrative law judges, the appeals board or its administrative law judges shall, upon request by the claimant, serve copies of all notices and transcript pertinent to such proceedings on the claimant and his counsel or agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

1958.

No cost shall be awarded in hearings on appeal by the Appeals Board, but if in the opinion of the Appeals Board, the claimant or an employer has acted in bad faith and without reasonable basis for appeal, a penalty not exceeding 10 percent of the amount finally awarded on the appeal may be taxed against and deducted from the award by the Appeals Board and shall be placed in the Unemployment Fund. In those cases where a penalty is assessed against an employer his account, as maintained under this act, shall be debited with the amount of the penalty so assessed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1959.

For the purpose of any investigation, hearing or proceeding under this division, the appeals board may delegate its power in relation thereto to any deputy, administrative law judge, or other person properly authorized in writing by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

1960.

Any finding of fact or law, judgment, conclusion, or final order made by a hearing officer, administrative law judge, or any person with the authority to make findings of fact or law in any action or proceeding before the appeals board, shall not be conclusive or binding in any separate or subsequent action or proceeding, and shall not be used as evidence in any separate or subsequent action or proceeding, between an individual and his or her present or prior employer brought before an arbitrator, court, or judge of this state or the United States, regardless of whether the prior action was between the same or related parties or involved the same
 facts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 283, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Public Employment Offices [2051. - 2061.]

2051.

The State of California accepts the provisions of the Wagner-Peyser Act, approved June 6, 1933, as amended by the Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (Public Law 105-220) passed by the Congress of the United States, and entitled “An act to provide for the establishment of a national employment system and for cooperation with the states in the promotion of the system, and for other purposes,” in conformity with Section 4 thereof, and will observe and comply with the requirements of that act.

The department is the agency of this state for the purposes of that act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2052.

The director may cooperate with any authority of the United States having powers and duties under the Wagner-Peyser Act, and may do and perform all things necessary to secure to this State the benefits of that act in the promotion and maintenance of a system of public employment offices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

2053.

All money received by the State under the Wagner-Peyser Act and paid into the Unemployment Administration Fund shall be expended as provided by this division and by that act of Congress.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1729.)
-------------------------------------------

2054.

(a) The director shall:

(1) Establish, maintain, and operate adequately staffed public employment offices for men, women, and youth who are legally qualified to engage in gainful occupations and shall maintain a veterans’ placement service to be devoted to securing work for veterans and a farm placement service to promote the placement and clearance of agricultural labor, and a youth placement service to promote the placement of youth in suitable fields of employment. The director shall also establish and maintain a job counseling and placement service for those persons who are encountering, or may be expected to encounter difficulty in securing or keeping a job principally because of their age. The maintenance of a farm placement service shall not be required during such time as applicable federal laws provide for a system of farm labor placement financed from federal funds which is separate and apart from the general system of public employment offices. Adequate records and statistics on all the classifications specified in this subdivision shall be compiled and kept, and a report of these records, statistics, applications, and placements shall be made semiannually.

(2) Procure, by lease or otherwise, suitable offices, and incur the necessary expenses in the conduct thereof.

(b) It is the policy of this state to make every reasonable effort to assist men and women who are leaving active duty with the armed services of the United States in obtaining employment in the civilian workforce. These efforts shall include outreach to those service personnel who will be leaving active duty in the near future, including job seminars and job fairs at military bases.

(c) The director shall perform the duties required by this section within existing budgetary resources of the agency within which the department operates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 987, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2055.

Free public employment offices shall be maintained in the Cities of San Francisco, Los Angeles, Oakland and Sacramento, and, whenever the director deems it necessary, in other cities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1729.)
-------------------------------------------

2056.

The director may:

(a) Create unemployment districts.

(b) Promulgate such rules as he finds desirable for the registration of unemployed persons, and for placing them in available employment. To this end he may accept financial contributions from any governmental unit or agency, or private persons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

2057.

For the purpose of establishing and maintaining free public employment offices, the director may enter into agreements with the Railroad Retirement Board, or any other agency of the United States charged with the administration of an unemployment compensation law, with any political subdivision of this State, or with any private, nonprofit organization, and as a part of any such agreement, may accept money, services, quarters, or other valuable consideration as a contribution to the employment service account in the Unemployment Administration Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

2058.

The department shall cooperate with other departments, agencies, and institutions both public and private in providing youth placement services and in the development of youth employment programs.

The department shall maintain current information on operations within the State of all types of youth employment programs such as the Youth Employment Service (Y.E.S.) and the Youth Employment Organization (Y.E.O.) plans, the work experience experimental program of the Department of Education, the Berkeley Workreation program, the effort by the Congress of Youth Coordinating Councils, and other similar programs. Upon request the department shall distribute to public and private agencies and groups information concerning any or all recognized plans for developing youth employment programs, the cooperative services offered by the various state and other public agencies in the field of youth employment, and the methods of initiating and developing such programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1490.)
-------------------------------------------

2059.

For the purpose of implementing the program set forth in Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 10650) of Part 2 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the department may utilize funds available to provide training and placement for present and potential recipients of public assistance to the extent permitted by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1457.)
-------------------------------------------

2061.

It is the intent of the Legislature in adopting this section to ensure that job order information registered with the Job Service of the Employment Development Department and the One-Stop Career Centers System be shared as expeditiously and thoroughly as possible between the department’s field offices and one-stop career centers both in the local labor market and throughout the state.

The Legislature finds that job order sharing will result in better service to employers and more efficient service to job seekers.

The provisions of this section shall be subject to the limitations of federal budgetary constraints.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 152, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. Employment for Older Workers [2070. - 2078.]

2070.

It is the public policy of the State of California that manpower should be used to its fullest extent. This statement of policy compels the further conclusion that human beings seeking employment, or retention thereof, should be judged fairly and without resort to rigid and unsound rules that operate to disqualify significant portions of the population from gainful and useful employment. Accordingly, use by employers, employment agencies, and labor organizations of arbitrary and unreasonable rules which bar or terminate employment on the ground of age offend the public policy of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1623.)
-------------------------------------------

2071.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Employee” does not include any individual employed by his parents, spouse or child or in the domestic service of any person.

(b) “Employer” does not include any employer with less than six persons in his employ. It does include any employer with six or more employees. It also includes the State of California and any political subdivision thereof.

(c) “Employment agency” includes any person undertaking to procure employees or opportunities to work.

(d) “Labor organization” includes any organization that is constituted for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining or in dealing with employers concerning grievances, terms or conditions of employment or of other mutual aid or protection in connection with employees.

(e) “Person” includes one or more individuals, partnerships, associations, corporations, limited liability companies, legal representatives, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy or receivers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 84.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2073.

The department shall co-operate with other departments, agencies, and institutions both public and private in providing job counseling and placement services and developing employment programs for older workers, including employment programs to protect and safeguard the right and opportunity of such workers to seek, obtain, and hold employment without discrimination or abridgement on account of age, unless based upon a bona fide occupational qualification or upon applicable security regulations established by the United States or the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1623.)
-------------------------------------------

2074.

The department shall formulate policies to effectuate the purposes of this chapter and make recommendations to agencies and officers of the State and of local governments in aid of such policies and purposes. Nothing herein shall modify or supersede the authority or responsibility of the State Personnel Board to enforce the provisions of the State Civil Service Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1623.)
-------------------------------------------

2075.

The department shall carry on a continuing program of education, information, research, study, and community organization concerning the problems of older workers in seeking, obtaining, and holding employment without discrimination on account of age. The department shall create such local advisory agencies as in its judgment will aid in effectuating the purposes of this section, and may empower them to study the problems of discrimination on account of age and all problems relating to employment programs for older workers, and to foster through community effort co-operation among the various groups and elements of the population of the State and to make recommendations to the department for the development of policies and procedures to carry out the purposes of this section. Such advisory agencies shall be composed of representative citizens, serving without pay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1623.)
-------------------------------------------

2076.

The department shall issue such publications and such results of research and other activities as in its judgment will tend to minimize or eliminate discrimination in employment on account of age.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1623.)
-------------------------------------------

2078.

The age limitations of the apprenticeship programs in which the State participates shall not be considered discriminatory within the meaning of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1623.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Violations [2101. - 2129.]

2101.

(a) It is a violation of this chapter to willfully make a false statement or representation, to knowingly fail to disclose a material fact, or to use a false name, false social security number, or other false identification to obtain, increase, reduce, or defeat any benefit or payment, whether for the maker or for any other person, under any of the following statutes administered by the department:

(1) The provisions of this division.

(2) The provisions of any unemployment insurance law of the federal government.

(3) The provisions of any training allowance law of the federal government.

(4) The provisions of any trade readjustment allowance law of the federal government.

(5) The provisions of any other allowance law of the federal government.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the applicability of Section 470 of the Penal Code to any acts or omissions which violate this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 397, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2101.5.

It is a violation of this chapter to willfully make a false statement or representation or knowingly fail to disclose a material fact for the purpose of lowering or avoiding any contribution required of the maker or other person, or to avoid becoming or remaining subject to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2101.6.

(a) It is a violation of this chapter for any person or business entity to procure, counsel, advise, or coerce anyone to willfully make a false statement or representation, or to knowingly fail to disclose a material fact in order to lower or avoid any contribution or to avoid being or remaining subject to this division.

(b) It is a violation of this chapter for any person or business entity to willfully aid or assist anyone in making a false statement or representation, or in knowingly failing to disclose a
 material fact, in order to lower or avoid any contribution, or to avoid being or remaining subject to this division.

(c) For purposes of this section, “business entity” means a partnership, corporation, association, limited liability company, or Indian tribe, as described in Section 3306(u) of Title 26 of the United States Code, or any other legal entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 117, Sec. 8.   (AB 1695)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2102.

(a) It is a violation of this chapter for any person residing in this state to willfully make a false statement or representation or knowingly fail to disclose a material fact to obtain or increase benefits or payments under the provisions of the unemployment insurance law of any other state.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the applicability of Section 470 of the Penal Code to any acts or omissions which violate this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2103.

It is a violation of this chapter for any employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit to make a greater deduction from the wages of a worker than the contribution required of such worker under this division, for the purpose of paying any contribution required under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2104.

It is a violation of this chapter for any employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit to willfully and unlawfully fail to appear, testify, or produce books, papers, and records, required at any hearing under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2105.

It is a violation of this chapter for any employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit, to willfully and unlawfully fail or neglect to make available required records for the inspection of the director or his authorized representatives at any reasonable time during business hours.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2106.

It is a violation of this chapter for any employing unit, or any officer or agent of an employing unit, to willfully and unlawfully fail or neglect to furnish to the director reports required by him when necessary for the enforcement of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

2107.

It is a violation of this chapter for any employing unit, including a manager or managing member of a limited liability company, or any officer or agent of an employing unit or any individual to connive or conspire to aid such individual to obtain benefits to which he or she is not entitled by the willful withholding of information or by the willful failure to report any relevant information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 85.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2108.

It is a violation of this chapter for any person to willfully fail or refuse to make any contributions which are due under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2109.

The executive officer, general manager, or any other person having charge of the affairs of a corporation, association, or limited liability company who willfully fails to register such corporation, association, or limited liability company as an employing unit, or willfully fails to submit contribution returns, earning reports, or other returns and reports required by this division, or by authorized regulations, is in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 86.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2110.

Any employing unit, including any individual member of a partnership employing unit, any officer of a corporate or association employing unit, any manager or managing member of a limited liability company, or any other person having charge of the affairs of a corporate, association, or limited liability company employing unit, that knowingly withholds the deductions required by this division from remuneration paid to its workers, and willfully fails or is willfully financially unable to pay such deductions to the department on the date on which they become delinquent is in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 87.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2110.3.

Any employing unit, including any individual member of a partnership employing unit, any officer of a corporate or association employing unit, any manager or managing member of a limited liability company, or any other person having charge of the affairs of a corporate, association, or limited liability company employing unit, that knowingly undertakes or agrees to pay without deduction from remuneration paid to its workers the amount of any contributions to the Disability Fund required of the workers under this division and that willfully fails or is willfully financially unable to pay the amount to the department on the date on which the contributions become delinquent is in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 88.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2110.5.

Any employing unit, including any individual member of a partnership employing unit, any officer of a corporate or association employing unit, any manager or managing member of a limited liability company, or any other person having charge of the affairs of a corporate, association, or limited liability company employing unit, that willfully fails to withhold in trust the deductions required by this division from remuneration paid to its workers, except where such employing unit undertakes or agrees to pay without deduction from the wages of its workers the amount of worker contributions required of its workers under this division, is in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 89.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2110.7.

Any employing unit, including any individual member of a partnership employing unit, any officer of a corporate or association employing unit, any manager or managing member of a limited liability company, or any other person having charge of the affairs of a corporate, association, or limited liability company employing unit, that knowingly undertakes or agrees to pay without deduction from remuneration paid to its workers the amount of any contributions to the Disability Fund required of such workers under this division and that willfully fails to hold in trust the amount of worker contributions required of such workers under this division is in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 90.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2111.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 1094, and except with respect to information furnished by the department in connection with its participation as a party or as a lien claimant in a judicial or administrative proceeding, information obtained in the course of administration of this division is confidential and shall not be published or open to public inspection in any manner. Any officer or employee of the state (including its political subdivisions), or any former member, officer or employee or other individual, who in the course of his or her employment or duty has or had access to returns, reports, or documents maintained under this division, who violates this section is in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

2112.

Unless otherwise specified in subdivision (b) of Section 2101 or in Section 2114, 2115, or 2116, every person who willfully violates any provision of this division or any authorized regulation promulgated or published in accordance with this division, is in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

2113.

Nothing in this division shall prevent the department from accepting restitution or an acceptable arrangement for restitution, made voluntarily before the department files a criminal complaint under Section 2101 or 2102, for overpayment of benefits from any person, who has not previously claimed any right under this section, who has not been convicted of an offense under Section 2101 or 2102 within three years preceding the service under this section of a written notice of intent to file a criminal complaint and who has willfully made a false statement or representation or knowingly failed to disclose a material fact to obtain or increase any benefit under any provision of this division. The department shall by mail or personal service give the person written notice of intent to file a criminal complaint under Section 2101 or 2102 not less than 10 days prior to the filing of the criminal complaint. The department may accept restitution or an arrangement for restitution and any such acceptance shall be in lieu of any criminal action against the person, except that the department shall not be precluded from filing a criminal action against any person who defaults under an arrangement for restitution which it has accepted. For purposes of this section, no period of time during which an arrangement for restitution is in effect shall be a part of any limitation of the time for commencing a criminal action. The department shall deposit amounts received from any person under this section in the fund from which the overpayments were made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

2114.

Any individual who, with the intent to defraud, reports or registers a fictitious employer or fictitious employee, and fictitious wages, to the department in order to obtain benefits or increase any benefit or payment, whether for the maker or for any other person, is in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 18.5.)
-------------------------------------------

2115.

Any employing unit or any officer or agent of an employing unit who, with the intent to defraud, falsely reports the amount of wages earned by an employee or who falsely reports the time period in which wages are earned by an employee for the purpose of obtaining or increasing any benefit amount for that employee, is in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

2116.

It is unlawful to do any of the following:

(a) Falsely certify the medical condition of any person in order to obtain disability insurance benefits, including family temporary disability insurance benefits, whether for the maker or for any other person.

(b) Knowingly present or cause to be presented any false or fraudulent written or oral material statement in support of any claim for disability insurance including family temporary disability insurance benefits.

(c) Knowingly solicit, receive, offer, pay, or accept any rebate, refund, commission, preference, patronage, dividend, discount, or other consideration, whether in the form of money or otherwise, as compensation or inducement for soliciting a claimant to apply for disability insurance including family temporary disability insurance benefits unless the payment is lawful pursuant to Section 650 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) Knowingly assist, abet, solicit, or conspire with any person who engages in an unlawful act under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 901, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 7 of Ch. 901.)
-------------------------------------------

2117.

Any person who, with or without intent to evade any requirement of this code or any lawful requirement of the department under this code, fails to file any return or report, or to supply any information required by this code or who, with or without like intent, makes, renders, signs, or verifies any false or fraudulent return, report, or statement, or supplies any false or fraudulent information, is liable for a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and is also guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be fined an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or be imprisoned for not more than one year, or both the fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2117.5.

Any person who, within the time required by this code, willfully fails to file any return or report, or to supply any information with intent to evade any tax imposed by this code, or who, willfully and with like intent, makes, renders, signs, or verifies any false or fraudulent return, report, or statement or supplies any false or fraudulent information, is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or in the state prison, or by a fine of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2118.

Any person or employer who, with or without intent to evade, fails to withhold, pursuant to Section 13020, or fails to pay over any tax withheld, is guilty of a misdeameanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both the fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

2118.5.

Any person required by this code to collect, account for, and pay over any tax or amount required to be withheld who willfully fails to collect or truthfully account for and pay over the tax or amount shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined an amount not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both the fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 597.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

2119.

Any person or employer required under Section 13050 to furnish a statement who willfully furnishes a false or fraudulent statement or who willfully fails to furnish a statement in the manner, at the time, and showing the information required under Section 13050, or regulations prescribed thereunder, is in violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 23.)
-------------------------------------------

2120.

Any individual required to supply information to his or her employer under Section 13040, 13041, or 13042, who willfully supplies false or fraudulent information, or who willfully fails to supply information thereunder which would require an increase in the tax to be withheld under Section 13020, is in violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

2121.

Any person who willfully aids or assists in, or procures, counsels, advises, or coerces anyone in the preparation or presentation under, or in connection with any matter arising under, this code, of a return, report, affidavit, claim, or other document, that is fraudulent or is false as to any material matter, whether or not the falsity or fraud is with the knowledge or consent of the person authorized or required to present the return, report, affidavit, claim, or document is in violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1050, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2122.

Except as provided in Sections 2117, 2117.5, 2118, and 2118.5, a violation of this chapter is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or in the state prison, or by a fine of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

2122.5.

Any fine imposed by the court pursuant to this chapter, except for fines imposed under Sections 2101 and 2102, shall be paid to the office of the prosecutor bringing the complaint, but if the case was referred to the prosecutor by the department, or some other governmental unit, one-half of the criminal fine shall be paid to that governmental unit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 604, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2123.

The certificate of the department to the effect that a return or report has not been filed or that information has not been supplied as required by Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) is prima facie evidence that the return or report has not been filed or that the information has not been supplied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2124.

(a) The place of trial for offenses enumerated in this chapter shall be in any of the following:

(1) The county of residence or principal place of business of the defendant or defendants.

(2) Any county where the defendant or defendants were transacting business that resulted in the alleged offenses.

(3) Any county where any money or property from the alleged offenses was obtained.

(b) If none of the counties under subdivision (a) are applicable, then the place of trial for offenses enumerated in this chapter shall be in the County of
 Sacramento.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 101, Sec. 2.   (AB 2227)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2125.

Any action or prosecution under this chapter shall be instituted within four years after the discovery of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 724, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

2126.
